Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2,228
Biennial report for Secretary of
State.

(MBCA 16.21)
Each domestic corporation and each foreign corporation authorized to transact
business in this state shall deliver to the Secretary of State for filing
a biennial report as required under section 21-301 or 21-304.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 228.